nb: Type landingsunderstell for fly: Amfibiske flottører; Fast halehjul; Fast nesehjul; Innfellbart nesehjul; Meier; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de trem de pouso da aeronave: Flutuadores anfíbios; Trem de pouso convencional fixo; Triciclo fixo; Triciclo retrátil; Esquis; Outro
fr: Type de train d’atterrissage de l’avion: Flotteurs amphibies; Train classique fixe; Train tricycle fixe; Train tricycle escamotable; Patins; Autre
bg-BG: Тип колесник на въздухоплавателното средство: Амфибийни поплавъци; Фиксиран с опашно колело; Фиксиран триколесен; Прибиращ се триколесен; Плъзгачи; Друго
el: Τύπος συστήματος προσγείωσης αεροσκαφών: Αμφίβιοι πλωτήρες; Σταθερό με ουραίο τροχό; Σταθερό τρικύκλιο; Ανασυρόμενο τρικύκλιο; Πέδιλα; Άλλο
pl: Typ podwozia statku powietrznego: Pływaki amfibijne; Stałe z kołem ogonowym; Stałe trójkołowe; Chowane trójkołowe; Płozy; Inne
vi: Loại càng hạ cánh của máy bay: Phao lội nước; Bánh đáp đuôi cố định; Bánh đáp ba cụm cố định; Bánh đáp ba cụm thu vào được; Càng đáp trượt; Khác
en: Aircraft landing gear type: Amphibious floats; Fixed taildragger; Fixed tricycle; Retractable tricycle; Skids; Other
de: Typ des Flugzeugfahrwerks: Amphibienschwimmer; Festes Spornradfahrwerk; Festes Bugradfahrwerk; Einziehbares Bugradfahrwerk; Kufen; Sonstige
sv: Typ av landningsställ för flygplan: Amfibiska flottörer; Fast sporrhjul; Fast noshjul; Infällbart noshjul; Medar; Annan
sk-SK: Typ podvozku lietadla: Obojživelné plaváky; Pevný s ostrohovým kolieskom; Pevný trojkolesový; Zaťahovací trojkolesový; Lyžiny; Iný
th: ประเภทล้อลงจอดของอากาศยาน: ทุ่นสะเทินน้ำสะเทินบก; ล้อหางแบบติดตาย; ล้อสามล้อแบบติดตาย; ล้อสามล้อแบบพับเก็บได้; ขาสกี; อื่นๆ
fi: Lentokoneen laskutelineiden tyyppi: Amfibiokellukkeet; Kiinteä kannuspyörä; Kiinteä nokkapyörä; Sisäänvedettävä nokkapyörä; Jalakset; Muu
hu: Repülőgép-futómű típusa: Kétéltű úszótalpak; Fix farokkerekes; Fix orrkerekes; Behúzható orrkerekes; Csúszótalpak; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tipul trenului de aterizare al aeronavei: Flotoare amfibii; Fix cu roată de coadă; Fix triciclu; Triciclu retractabil; Patine; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta pristajalnega podvozja letala: Amfibijski plovci; Fiksno z repnim kolesom; Fiksno tricikel; Uvlačljivo tricikel; Sani; Drugo
ru: Тип шасси самолета: Амфибийные поплавки; Неубирающееся с хвостовым колесом; Неубирающееся трехстоечное; Убирающееся трехстоечное; Полозья; Другое
ja: 航空機着陸ギアタイプ: 水陸両用フロート; 固定式尾輪; 固定式三輪; 引込式三輪; スキッド; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta podvozja zrakoplova: Amfibijski plovci; Fiksni repni kotač; Fiksni tricikl; Uvlačivi tricikl; Saonice; Ostalo
da: Type landingsstel for luftfartøj: Amfibiske pontoner; Fast halehjul; Fast næsehjul; Optrækkeligt næsehjul; Meder; Andet
nl: Type landingsgestel vliegtuig: Amfibische drijvers; Vast staartwiel; Vast neuswiel; Intrekbaar neuswiel; Glijders; Overig
ko: 항공기 착륙 장치 유형: 수륙 양용 플로트; 고정식 테일드래거; 고정식 트라이시클; 접이식 트라이시클; 스키드; 기타
zh-CN: 飞机起落架类型: 水陆两栖浮筒; 固定式后三点; 固定式前三点; 可收放式前三点; 滑橇; 其他
lt-LT: Orlaivio važiuoklės tipas: Amfibinės plūdės; Fiksuota su galiniu ratuku; Fiksuota triratė; Įtraukiama triratė; Pavažos; Kita
it: Tipo di carrello di atterraggio dell'aeromobile: Galleggianti anfibi; Biciclo fisso; Triciclo fisso; Triciclo retrattile; Pattini; Altro
zh-TW: 飛機起落架類型: 水陸兩用浮筒; 固定後三點式; 固定前三點式; 可收放前三點式; 滑橇; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de trem de aterragem da aeronave: Flutuadores anfíbios; Trem de cauda fixo; Triciclo fixo; Triciclo retrátil; Patins; Outro
tr: Uçak iniş takımı tipi: Amfibi dubalar; Sabit kuyruk tekerlekli; Sabit üç tekerlekli; Katlanabilir üç tekerlekli; Kızaklar; Diğer
cs: Typ podvozku letadla: Obojživelné plováky; Pevný ostruhový podvozek; Pevný příďový podvozek; Zatahovací příďový podvozek; Ližiny; Jiné
es: Tipo de tren de aterrizaje del avión: Flotadores anfibios; Patín de cola fijo; Triciclo fijo; Triciclo retráctil; Patines; Otro